Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-901.02
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) The regulatory authority given to agencies has a significant impact on the people of the state;

(2) When agencies create substantive standards by which Nebraskans are expected to abide, it is essential that those standards be adopted through the rules and regulations process to enable the public to be aware of the standards and have an opportunity to participate in the approval or repeal process;

(3) Agencies should be encouraged to advise the public of current opinions, interpretations, approaches, and likely courses of action by means of guidance documents; and

(4) Oversight of the regulatory authority over occupations and professions given to agencies is required to ensure respect for the fundamental right of an individual to pursue an occupation.

Laws 2016, LB867, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB299, § 17.
July 1, 2019